Hawaii statutes.
[§657-1.5] Limitation of actions not
applicable to State. No limitation of actions provided for under this or
any other chapter shall apply to bar the institution or maintenance of any
action by or on behalf of the State and its agencies, unless the State is
specifically designated in such a statute as subject to the limitation period
contained therein. No defense to any action brought by the State or any of its
agencies shall be predicated upon the lapse of time. [L 1991, c 8, §1]

Case Notes

Plaintiffs water commission and department of water supply of
county of Hawaii could not benefit from this section; plaintiffs were obligated
to bring their claims in a timely manner within applicable limitations period.
930 F. Supp. 1411 (1996).

Where plaintiff office of Hawaiian affairs brought suit in
its own corporate name under §10-16, rather than as an agency of the State on
behalf of the people of the State, this section did not exempt plaintiff from
the statute of limitations for bringing a suit under §673-10. 110 H. 338, 133
P.3d 767 (2006).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next